Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-809
Commission; powers.

The Commission of Industrial Relations is hereby granted full power to adopt all reasonable and proper regulations to govern its proceedings, the filing of pleadings, the issuance and service of process, the issuance of subpoenas for attendance of witnesses, the power to administer oaths, and to regulate the mode and manner of all its investigations, inspections, hearings and trials. In the taking of evidence, the rules of evidence, prevailing in the trial of civil cases in Nebraska shall be observed by the Commission of Industrial Relations.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 9, p. 590.

Under powers granted in this section, Court of Industrial Relations may adopt rules required under the Administrative Procedures Act. School Dist. of Seward Education Assn. v. School Dist. of Seward, 188 Neb. 772, 199 N.W.2d 752 (1972).